Hawaii statutes.
PART
VIII. REQUIREMENT AND EFFECT OF

ACKNOWLEDGING,
RECORDING, NOT RECORDING

Note

Sections 502-81 to 502-85 designated as Part VIII and part
heading amended by L 2009, c 102, §2(9).

§502-81 Instruments may be recorded; as
evidence. Every conveyance or other instrument, acknowledged or proved,
and certified in the manner hereinbefore prescribed, by any of the officers
before named, may be read in evidence without further proof thereof, and is
entitled to be recorded. [CC 1859, §1258; am imp L 1917, c 207, §1; am L 1921,
c 34, §1; RL 1925, §3168; RL 1935, §5154; RL 1945, §12754; RL 1955, §343-47;
HRS §502-81]

Case Notes

Deed of corporation admissible in evidence, when. 18 H. 412,
413.

Where due execution shown instrument admissible in evidence even
if certificate of acknowledgment invalid. 26 H. 121.

Agreement between grantee named in a deed and another
declaring that both had interests in the land and setting out terms of their
arrangement, entitled to be recorded. 32 H. 323, 325.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next